Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [549.275] ATTORNEY REVIEW FOR INJURED PARTIES; SETTLEMENT AGREEMENTS. new text end new text begin (a) The court must appoint an attorney adviser or guardian ad litem in any case involving a settlement agreement between parties to a case if it appears to the court that one of the parties may suffer from a brain injury resulting in a mental or cognitive injury. Alternatively, an attorney for a party who has a medical diagnosis of a brain injury must file a motion for the appointment of an attorney adviser or guardian ad litem prior to a settlement agreement if the attorney is aware that their client has a brain injury that has caused a mental or cognitive impairment. Filings related to the mental or cognitive impairment and brain injury must be filed in a confidential manner. new text end new text begin (b) The appointed attorney adviser or guardian ad litem must make an independent assessment and advise the court whether the proposed settlement is in the best interest of the party whom they have been assigned to assist, taking into consideration the party's medical history and dependents, if any. The attorney adviser or guardian ad litem may consult with a certified public accountant, actuary, or other licensed professional adviser, if necessary. Costs and reasonable fees for the appointed attorney adviser or guardian ad litem may be distributed through the settlement or assigned by the court and must not exceed $3,000. The fee may be deposited with and disbursed to the attorney adviser or guardian ad litem by the court. new text end new text begin (c) The appointed attorney adviser or guardian ad litem must consider the following factors when making a report to the court on the best interest of the party they are assigned to assist: new text end new text begin (1) the reasonable preference of the party in light of the party's age, mental capacity, maturity, and understanding of the settlement agreement; new text end new text begin (2) if the settlement seems reasonable given the facts of the case for a similarly situated party; new text end new text begin (3) if the case involves injuries to the party, whether or not the settlement covers past or future medical expenses; and new text end new text begin (4) the impact of the settlement on the party's ability to support themselves, their spouse, or their dependents. new text end new text begin (d) The attorney appointed by the court must report to the court the attorney's assessment and advice in a manner directed by the court in the appointing order. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin STUDY ON STRUCTURED SETTLEMENT TRANSFERS.new text end new text begin (a) The attorney general is directed to complete a study of the impact of the updates to the structured settlement law in 2022. The chief justice of the supreme court is directed to assist the attorney general in completing the study. The study must include reviewing and compiling the information on cases under the new laws, including: new text end new text begin (1) when a discretionary appointment was made under Minnesota Statutes, section 549.405, subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (2) when a mandatory appointment was made under Minnesota Statutes, section 549.405, subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (3) how many cases involved minors; new text end new text begin (4) how many cases involved parties with a mental or cognitive impairment; new text end new text begin (5) how many cases had a motion made under Minnesota Statutes, section 549.405, subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (6) how many reports were filed under Minnesota Statutes, section 549.405, subdivision 4; and new text end new text begin (7) how many settlements were approved by the court and how many were denied. new text end new text begin (b) The attorney general may review and include other data that helps to determine the impact of changes to the structured settlement laws and other legislative proposals that would assist payees in structured settlement transfers. The attorney general must provide a report on the study to the chair and minority lead for the committees with jurisdiction over civil law in the house of representatives and the senate by January 15, 2026. new text end